Utah statutes.
63J-4-301.   Duties of the executive director and office.

(1)  The executive director and the office shall:

(a)  comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act;

(b)  under the direct supervision of the governor, assist the governor in the preparation of the governor's budget recommendations;

(c)  advise the governor with regard to approval or revision of agency work programs as specified in Section 63J-1-209;

(d)  establish benchmarking practices for measuring operational costs, quality of service, and effectiveness across all state agencies and programs;

(e)  assist agencies with the development of an operational plan that uses continuous improvement tools and operational metrics to increase statewide capacity and improve interagency integration;

(f)  review and assess agency budget requests and expenditures using a clear set of goals and measures;

(g)  develop and maintain enterprise portfolio and electronic information systems to select and oversee the execution of projects, ensure a return on investment, and trace and report performance metrics; and

(h)  perform other duties and responsibilities as assigned by the governor.

(2) (a)  The executive director of the Governor's Office of Management and Budget or the executive director's designee is the Federal Assistance Management Officer.

(b)  In acting as the Federal Assistance Management Officer, the executive director or designee shall:

(i)  study the administration and effect of federal assistance programs in the state and advise the governor and the Legislature, through the Office of Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Executive Appropriations Committee, of alternative recommended methods and procedures for the administration of these programs;

(ii)  assist in the coordination of federal assistance programs that involve or are administered by more than one state agency; and

(iii)  analyze and advise on applications for new federal assistance programs submitted to the governor for approval as required by Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures.



Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session

